Hawaii statutes.
PART X.
ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES

Note

Part heading amended by L 2008, c 154, §1.

Cross References

Dependent elder abuse; suits by the State; civil penalties,
see §28-94.

Maximum fee for appointed counsel and guardian ad litem, see
§571-87.

Law Journals and Reviews

Elder Law Hawaii. 13 HBJ, no. 13, at 85 (2009).

Holding Hawai‘i Nursing Facilities Accountable for the
Inadequate Pain Management of Elderly Residents. 27 UH L. Rev. 233 (2004).

§346-221 Purpose; construction. The
legislature recognizes that citizens of the State who are vulnerable to abuse
constitute a significant and identifiable segment of the population and are
particularly subject to risks of abuse, neglect, and exploitation.

The legislature recognizes that it is a person's
vulnerability, not necessarily age, which is often encountered in cases of
abuse, neglect, and exploitation. While advanced age alone is not sufficient
reason to intervene in a person's life, the legislature finds that many elders
have become subjects of abuse, neglect, and exploitation. Substantial public
interest exists to ensure that this segment of the population receives
protection.

The legislature declares that the State shall
develop and promote community services for the economic, social, and personal
well-being and protection of its citizens who may be vulnerable to abuse.

In taking this action, the legislature intends
to protect vulnerable adults and place the fewest possible restrictions on
personal liberty and to permit the exercise of constitutional rights by adults
consistent with protection from abuse. [L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L 1990, c
67, §8, c 144, §1, and c 234, §9; am L 2008, c 154, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next